Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-236
School lands; lease; notice of delinquency; how given.

The notice required by section 72-235 shall be given by either registered or certified letter or by publication for three weeks in a newspaper published or of general circulation in the county where the land is located. In serving the notice of delinquency the Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall recognize as the lessee the person or persons whose name appears last of record in the office of the board.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 17, p. 309;

Laws 1903, c. 100, § 1, p. 571;

R.S.1913, § 5863;

C.S.1922, § 5199;

Laws 1927, c. 192, § 1, p. 548;

C.S.1929, § 72-219;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 12, p. 605;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-219;

R.S.1943, § 72-236;

Laws 1957, c. 242, § 55, p. 864;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 28.